Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.080

Direct or collateral attack barred after thirty days.

No direct or collateral attack on any public facilities district purported to be authorized or created in conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after creation by the county legislative authority.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1995 1st sp.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 36.100.010.